South Dakota, session 2026, HB1020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 40-18-16 be AMENDED:
40-18-16. The board may promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to:
(1) Describe prohibited brand symbols for various types of livestock and identify
locations on animals where a brand is permitted;
(2) Provide for the registration, transfer, and renewal of livestock brands;
(3) Establish a brand registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars;
(4) Establish a brand renewal fee not to exceed:
(a) Eighteen dollars per year; or
(b) Ninety dollars for each five-year ownership period;
(5) Establish a brand transfer fee not to exceed fifty dollars;
(6) Establish an ownership inspection fee not to exceed one dollar and sixty-five cents
for each head of livestock;
(7) Establish recordable livestock brands;
(8) Establish law enforcement, ownership inspection, and transportation requirements
within or without the ownership inspection area;
(9) Establish a duplicate certificate fee not to exceed twenty dollars;
(10) Establish a mileage fee for inspectors not to exceed the rate set pursuant to § 3-
9-1;
(11) Establish an inspection fee for livestock located outside the ownership inspection
area not to exceed one dollar and sixty-five cents for each head of livestock; and
(12) Establish a brand registration application fee not to exceed fifty dollars.

26.419.10 2 1020
Section 2. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
HB1020 ENROLLED

26.419.10 3 1020
An Act to increase the maximum amount allowable for the livestock ownership inspection fee
and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1020
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1020 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1020 ENROLLED